apertium-wal.wal.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for Wolaytta

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<adj%>		! Adjectives
%<prep%>	! Prepositions
%<conn%>	! Connections
%<adv%> 	! Adverbs
%<ij%>		! Interjections
%<n%>  		! Noun
%<v%>  		! Verb
%<p1%>  	! First Person
%<p2%> 		! Second Person
%<p3%> 		! Third Person
%<plr%> 	! Plural
%<sing%>	! Singular
%<fem%> 	! Feminine
%<masc%> 	! Masculine
%<prf%> 	! Perfective
%<imfr%> 	! Imperfective
%<neg%> 	! Negative
%<tv%> 		! Transitive Verb
%<iv%> 		! Intransitive Verb
%<caus%> 	! Causative
%<rel%> 	! Passive
%<intr%> 	! Introgetive
%<fut%> 	! Introgetive
%<opt%> 	! Introgetive
%<intrEnding%> 	! IntrogetiveEnding
%<shortcnvb%> 	! Short Converb
%<longcnvb%> 	! Long Converb
%<simu%> 	! Simultaneous
%<prn%>		! Pronoun
%<refl%>	! Reflexive
%<nmlz%>	! Nominalizer
%<inf%>		! Infinitive
%>     		! Morpheme Boundary

%<noncon%>    	! Non-concrete Noun form
%<con%>         ! Concrete noun form
%<nom%>         ! Nominative case
%<abs%>         ! Absolutive case
%<obl%>         ! Oblique case
%<inter%>       ! Interrogative case
%<voc%>         ! Vocative case

%<post%>        ! Postposition

%<percent%>     ! Percent
%<sent%>        ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>        ! Hyphen
%<cm%>          ! Comma
%<apos%>        ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>       ! Quote marker (right hand side)
%<lquot%>       ! Quote marker (left hand side)
%<rpar%>        ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side)
%<lpar%>        ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side)

%{V%}  ! placeholder for vowel gemination
!%{tv%} ! triggers change to s
!%{h%}  ! becomes h to make "sh" clusters
%{‼%}  ! blocks phonology from applying, so that we can have exceptions

%>              ! Morpheme boundary
%-
%  
%+
%−
%'


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

NounRoot ;
VerbRoot ;
Pronouns ;
NumberRoot ;
Punctuation ;
Interjections ;
Adjectives ;
Prepositions ;
Connections ;
Adverbs ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Prepositions

giddon:giddon PREP ; ! "among"
giddo:giddo PREP ; ! "between"
giddoppe:giddoppe PREP ; ! "between, among"
gidduwan:gidduwan PREP ; ! "between
guyiyan:guyiyan PREP ; ! "after, later in time or place"
hegaattoo:hegaattoo PREP ; ! "like that"
hegaadankka:hegaadankka PREP ; ! ""
hegaadan:hegaadan PREP ; ! ""
hegaattoo:hegaattoo PREP ; ! ""
hegaanne:hegaanne PREP ; ! ""
hegaa:hegaa PREP ; ! ""
malatiya:malatiya PREP ; ! ""
ussi:ussi PREP ; ! "Ex Naatussi"

LEXICON Connections

woy:woy CONN ; ! "either, neither"
gishshaw:gishshaw CONN ; ! "because"
gishshawu:gishshawu CONN ; ! "because"
gishshaassi:gishshaassi CONN ; ! "because"
attin:attin  CONN ; ! " except"
giikko:giikko  CONN ; ! " because"
ayssiis:ayssiis  CONN ; ! " because"
ayzziis:ayzziis  CONN ; ! " because"
gakkanaashin:gakkanaashin  CONN ; ! " nutil"
gakkanaassi:gakkanaassi  CONN ; ! " until"
gakkanaayyoo:gakkanaayyoo  CONN ; ! " still"
gishshaassi:gishshaassi  CONN ; ! ""
gishshataw:gishshataw  CONN ; ! ""
hagaatto:hagaatto  CONN ; ! " like this"
kko:kko  CONN ; ! ""
kkokka:kkokka  CONN ; ! ""
nne:nne  CONN ; ! ""
shin:shin  CONN ; ! ""
xayikko:xayikko  CONN ; ! ""
yye:yye  CONN ; ! "

LEXICON NumberRoot

iss:iss NUM-1 ; ! "1"
naʼʼ:naʼʼ NUM-2 ; ! "2"
heezz:heezz NUM-2 ; ! "3"
oydd:oydd NUM-2 ; ! "4"
ichchash:ichchash NUM-2 ; ! "5"
usuppun:usuppun NUM-6 ; ! "6"
laappun:laappun NUM-6 ; ! "7"
hospun:hospun NUM-6 ; ! "8"
uddufun:uddufun NUM-6 ; ! "9"
tamm:tamm NUM-2 ; ! "10"
isiin:isiin NUM-11 ; ! "11"

!LEXICON RegNounInfl

!%<n%>%<sing%>:   # ;
!%<n%>%<plr%>:ta   # ;

LEXICON N-M-CMN-A  ! Masculine class A common nouns

%<n%>%<masc%>:%> N-M-CMN-A-INFL ;

LEXICON N-M-CMN-E  ! Masculine class E common nouns

%<n%>%<masc%>:%> N-M-CMN-E-INFL ;

LEXICON N-M-CMN-O  ! Masculine class O common nouns

%<n%>%<masc%>:%> N-M-CMN-O-INFL ;

LEXICON N-F-CMN ! Feminin common nouns

%<n%>%<fem%>:%> N-F-CMN-INFL ;

LEXICON N-M-PRSNAME-A  ! Masculine person name class A common nouns

%<n%>%<masc%>:%> N-M-PRSNAME-A-INFL ;

LEXICON N-M-PRSNAME-E  ! Masculine person name class E common nouns

%<n%>%<masc%>:%> N-M-PRSNAME-E-INFL ;

LEXICON N-M-PRSNAME-O  ! Masculine person name class O common nouns

%<n%>%<masc%>:%> N-M-PRSNAME-O-INFL ;

LEXICON N-M-PRSNAME-U  ! Masculine person name class U common nouns

%<n%>%<masc%>:%> N-M-PRSNAME-U-INFL ;

LEXICON N-F-PRSNAME ! Feminin common nouns

%<n%>%<fem%>:%> N-F-PRSNAME-INFL ;

LEXICON N-M-CMN-A-INFL

%<noncon%>%<abs%>:a # ;
%<noncon%>%<obl%>:a # ;
%<noncon%>%<nom%>:i # ;
%<noncon%>%<inter%>:ee # ;
%<noncon%>%<voc%>:oo # ;
%<con%>%<sing%>%<abs%>:aa # ;
%<con%>%<sing%>%<obl%>:aa # ;
%<con%>%<sing%>%<nom%>:ay # ;
%<con%>%<sing%>%<inter%>:ay # ;
%<con%>%<sing%>%<voc%>:aw # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<abs%>:ata # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<obl%>:atu # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<nom%>:ati # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<inter%>:atee # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<voc%>:atoo # ;

LEXICON N-M-CMN-E-INFL

%<noncon%>%<abs%>:e # ;
%<noncon%>%<obl%>:e # ;
%<noncon%>%<nom%>:ee # ;
%<noncon%>%<inter%>:ee # ;
%<noncon%>%<voc%>:oo # ;
%<noncon%>%<voc%>:ee # ;
%<con%>%<sing%>%<abs%>:iya # ;
%<con%>%<sing%>%<obl%>:iya # ;
%<con%>%<sing%>%<nom%>:ee # ;
%<con%>%<sing%>%<inter%>:ee # ;
%<con%>%<sing%>%<voc%>:iyaw # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<abs%>:eta # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<obl%>:etu # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<nom%>:eti # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<inter%>:etee # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<voc%>:etoo # ;

LEXICON N-M-CMN-O-INFL

%<noncon%>%<abs%>:o # ;
%<noncon%>%<obl%>:o # ;
%<noncon%>%<nom%>:oy # ;
%<noncon%>%<inter%>:oo # ;
%<noncon%>%<voc%>:oo # ;
%<con%>%<sing%>%<abs%>:uwa # ;
%<con%>%<sing%>%<obl%>:uwa # ;
%<con%>%<sing%>%<nom%>:oy # ;
%<con%>%<sing%>%<inter%>:oy # ;
%<con%>%<sing%>%<voc%>:uwaw # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<abs%>:ota # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<obl%>:otu # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<nom%>:oti # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<inter%>:otee # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<voc%>:otoo # ;

LEXICON N-F-CMN-INFL

%<noncon%>%<abs%>:o # ;
%<noncon%>%<obl%>:e # ;
%<noncon%>%<obl%>:i # ;
%<noncon%>%<nom%>:a # ;
%<noncon%>%<inter%>:oo # ;
%<noncon%>%<voc%>:oo # ;
%<con%>%<sing%>%<abs%>:iyo # ;
%<con%>%<sing%>%<obl%>:ee # ;
%<con%>%<sing%>%<nom%>:iya # ;
%<con%>%<sing%>%<inter%>:ii # ;
%<con%>%<sing%>%<voc%>:ee # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<abs%>:eta # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<obl%>:etu # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<nom%>:eti # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<inter%>:etee # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<voc%>:etoo # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<abs%>:ota # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<obl%>:otu # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<nom%>:oti # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<inter%>:otee # ;
%<con%>%<plr%>%<voc%>:otoo # ;

LEXICON N-PLNAME-A ! Place name noun class A inflection

%<n%>%<abs%>:a # ;
%<n%>%<obl%>:a # ;
%<n%>%<nom%>:i # ;
%<n%>%<inter%>:ee # ;
%<n%>%<voc%>:aa # ;
%<n%>%<adv%>:i # ;

LEXICON N-PLNAME-E ! Place name noun class E inflection

%<n%>%<abs%>:e # ;
%<n%>%<obl%>:e # ;
%<n%>%<nom%>:ee # ;
%<n%>%<inter%>:ee # ;
%<n%>%<voc%>:ee # ;

LEXICON N-PLNAME-O ! Place name noun class O inflection

%<n%>%<abs%>:o # ;
%<n%>%<obl%>:o # ;
%<n%>%<nom%>:oy # ;
%<n%>%<inter%>:oo # ;
%<n%>%<voc%>:oo # ;

LEXICON N-M-PRSNAME-A-INFL ! Person name noun class A inflection

%<abs%>:a # ;
%<obl%>:a # ;
%<nom%>:i # ;
%<inter%>:ee # ;
%<voc%>:aa # ;

LEXICON N-M-PRSNAME-E-INFL ! Person name noun class E inflection
	
%<abs%>:a # ;
%<obl%>:e # ;
%<nom%>:ee # ;
%<inter%>:ee # ;
%<voc%>:ee # ;

LEXICON N-M-PRSNAME-O-INFL ! Person name noun class O inflection

%<abs%>:a # ;
%<obl%>:o # ;
%<nom%>:oy # ;
%<inter%>:ee # ;
%<voc%>:oo # ;

LEXICON N-M-PRSNAME-U-INFL ! Person name noun class U inflection

%<abs%>:a # ;
%<obl%>:u # ;
%<nom%>:u # ;
%<inter%>:ee # ;
%<voc%>:oo # ;

LEXICON N-F-PRSNAME-INFL

%<abs%>:o # ;
%<obl%>:i # ;
%<nom%>:a # ;
%<inter%>:ii # ;
%<voc%>:ee # ;

LEXICON NounRoot					!To be checked manually 
azazettiyog:azazettiyog N-M-CMN-A ; ! "obedience"
boggiyag:boggiyag N-M-CMN-A ; ! "bandit, robber, gangster, kidnapper"
daabul:daabul N-M-CMN-A ; ! "double, twice, killing the same species twice in one day"
dugett:dugett N-M-CMN-A ; ! "downslope, down hill, slope"
geedett:geedett N-M-CMN-A ; ! "correction, check, improvement, arrangement, preparation, adjustment, editing"
gurub:gurub N-M-CMN-A ; ! "Taani gurubaa siyada hanidabi aybakko be'anaw baas"
hoof:hoof N-M-CMN-A ; ! "lump, swelling on the body of people or animals"
kayyes:kayyes N-M-CMN-A ; ! ""
laqashett:laqashett N-M-CMN-A ; ! "listlessly grazing, the act of listlessly grazing grass and spitting it back out (sick cattle)"
maqettiyag:maqettiyag N-M-CMN-A ; ! "conspirator"
naxal:naxal N-M-CMN-A ; ! "toga, shawl, lightweight Ethiopian shawl"
poqett:poqett N-M-CMN-A ; ! "chafe"
saam:saam N-M-CMN-A ; ! "portion, share, lot, inheritance"
shoollaqett:shoollaqett N-M-CMN-A ; ! "hoarseness"
woriiq:woriiq N-M-CMN-A ; ! "idol worship, a form or style of idol worship, worshipped in a form of 'aljanuwa'"
zoriyag:zoriyag N-M-CMN-A ; ! "consultant, adviser"
awt:awt N-M-CMN-E ; ! "revenge, vengeance, retaliation"
bitan:bitan N-M-CMN-E ; ! "man (old)"
daaragindd:daaragindd N-M-CMN-E ; ! "a pen, stall, place where goats or sheep stay"
filoolooj:filoolooj N-M-CMN-E ; ! "Pilooloojee qaalatu/doonatu hara qaalatuura/doonatuura gayttiiyo gaytotaa pilggiya saynise"
gistt:gistt N-M-CMN-E ; ! "wheat"
Hidaar:Hidaar N-M-CMN-E ; ! "syn: Baraataa"
joyn:joyn N-M-CMN-E ; ! "Ha caana kaamee woqqu joyne sukkaariya oykkii"
kitt:kitt N-M-CMN-E ; ! "over dress (locally woven and tailored)"
lachch:lachch N-M-CMN-E ; ! ""
mandd:mandd N-M-CMN-E ; ! "hole, hole of local smoking pipe"
moytill:moytill N-M-CMN-E ; ! "ghost"
pilim:pilim N-M-CMN-E ; ! "film, movie"
qinxxall:qinxxall N-M-CMN-E ; ! "temple, either side of the head between the eye and the ear"
seer:seer N-M-CMN-E ; ! "local trousers, a kind of local trousers"
tott:tott N-M-CMN-E ; ! "raindrop, drip, drop of rain"
zar:zar N-M-CMN-E ; ! "ancestor, descendant, tribe, clan, member, partner, generation, relative, kin"
ancc:ancc N-M-CMN-O ; ! "sandy soil"
balibakk:balibakk N-M-CMN-O ; ! "cheat"
cac:cac N-M-CMN-O ; ! "forest plant"
diijj:diijj N-M-CMN-O ; ! "a quick rotating substance"
gayr:gayr N-M-CMN-O ; ! "eulogy"
hadhdhaf:hadhdhaf N-M-CMN-O ; ! "riding pillion"
kaal:kaal N-M-CMN-O ; ! "youngster"
kushett:kushett N-M-CMN-O ; ! "collaboration"
makkas:makkas N-M-CMN-O ; ! "rafter"
miz:miz N-M-CMN-O ; ! "feeding"
peen:peen N-M-CMN-O ; ! "smell"
qobb:qobb N-M-CMN-O ; ! "castor oil plant"
shitt:shitt N-M-CMN-O ; ! "perfume"
tiskkay:tiskkay N-M-CMN-O ; ! "scattering"
wuxaawux:wuxaawux N-M-CMN-O ; ! "wave"
zaar:zaar N-M-CMN-O ; ! "change"
balakk:balakk N-F-CMN ; ! "stepdaughter"
bullachchaay:bullachchaay N-F-CMN ; ! "bride"
danggiriix:danggiriix N-F-CMN ; ! "woman slave"
gaamm:gaamm N-F-CMN ; ! "lioness"
geedoss:geedoss N-F-CMN ; ! "younger sister"
god:god N-F-CMN ; ! "lady"
har:har N-F-CMN ; ! "jenny"
indd:indd N-F-CMN ; ! "hen"
kan:kan N-F-CMN ; ! "bitch"
laggett:laggett N-F-CMN ; ! "mistress"
machch:machch N-F-CMN ; ! "wife"
meenatt:meenatt N-F-CMN ; ! "sister-in-law"
mishechch:mishechch N-F-CMN ; ! "widow"
mushur:mushur N-F-CMN ; ! "bride"
polis:polis N-F-CMN ; ! "policewoman"
shaaramux:shaaramux N-F-CMN ; ! "adulteress"
uzz:uzz N-F-CMN ; ! "pullet"
wolaytt:Wolaytt N-PLNAME-A ; ! "Wolaita"
yesuus:Yesuus N-M-PRSNAME-A-INFL ; ! "Jesus"
kiristtoos:Kiristtoos N-M-PRSNAME-A-INFL ; ! "Christ"
afirkk:afirkk N-M-PRSNAME-A-INFL ; ! "Africa"
adimaas:adimaas N-M-PRSNAME-A-INFL ; ! "Admassu"
zar:zar N-M-PRSNAME-A-INFL ; ! "Admassu"
yoseph:yoseph N-M-PRSNAME-A-INFL ; ! "Yoseph"
amara: amara N-M-PRSNAME-A-INFL ; ! "Amhara"
habodd:habodd N-M-CMN-O-INFL ; ! "Haboddo play"
koolleer:koolleer N-M-CMN-A-INFL ; ! "Disease type"
kooshintt:kooshintt N-M-CMN-A-INFL ; ! "Type of Game"
soodd:soodd N-M-CMN-O-INFL ; ! "Wolaytta Soddo"
soof:soof N-M-CMN-A-INFL ; ! "Sofa"
buddeen:buddeen N-M-CMN-A-INFL ; ! "Injera"
